Utah statutes.
53A-17a-154.    Appropriation for school nurses.
The State Board of Education shall distribute monies appropriated in Section
53A-17a-104 for school nurses to award grants to school districts and charter
schools that:
(1)  provide an equal amount of matching funds; and
(2)  do not supplant other monies used for school nurses.
